Utah statutes.
26-19-6.   Action by department -- Notice to recipient.

(1) (a)  Within 30 days after commencing an action under Subsection 26-19-5(3), the department shall give the recipient, his guardian, personal representative, trustee, estate, or survivor, whichever is appropriate, written notice of the action by:

(i)  personal service or certified mail to the last known address of the person receiving the notice; or

(ii)  if no last-known address is available, by publishing a notice:

(A)  once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the recipient resides; and

(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for three weeks.

(b)  Proof of service shall be filed in the action.

(c)  The recipient may intervene in the department's action at any time before trial.

(2)  The notice required by Subsection (1) shall name the court in which the action is commenced and advise the recipient of:

(a)  the right to intervene in the proceeding;

(b)  the  right to obtain a private attorney; and

(c)  the department's right to recover medical assistance directly from the third party.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

